Missouri, session 2026, SB1342.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 71.012 and 71.015, RSMo, are repealed
and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 71.012 and 71.015, to read as follows:
71.012. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections
71.015 and 71.860 to 71.920, the governing body of any city,
town or village may annex unincorporated areas which are
contiguous and compact to the existing corporate limits of
the city, town or village pursuant to this section. The
term "contiguous and compact" does not include a situation
whereby the unincorporated area proposed to be annexed is
contiguous to the annexing city, town or village only by a
railroad line, trail, pipeline or other strip of real
property less than one-quarter mile in width within the
city, town or village so that the boundaries of the city,
town or village after annexation would leave unincorporated
areas between the annexed area and the prior boundaries of
the city, town or village connected only by such railroad
line, trail, pipeline or other such strip of real property.
The term contiguous and compact shall include a situation
whereby the unincorporated area proposed to be annexed would
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1342 2
be contiguous and compact to the existing corporate limits
of the city, town, or village but for an intervening state
highway or interstate highway as defined in section 304.001,
or railroad right-of-way, regardless of whether any other
city, town, or village has annexed such state or interstate
highway or railroad right-of-way or otherwise has an
easement in such state or interstate highway or railroad
right-of-way. The term contiguous and compact does not
prohibit voluntary annexations pursuant to this section
merely because such voluntary annexation would create an
island of unincorporated area within the city, town or
village, so long as the owners of the unincorporated island
were also given the opportunity to voluntarily annex into
the city, town or village. The term contiguous and compact
shall include a situation whereby the unincorporated area
proposed to be annexed is contiguous to the annexing city,
town, or village by at least twenty-five percent of the
length of the perimeter of the area proposed for
annexation. No city, town, or village shall annex an
unincorporated area contiguous to any unincorporated area
annexed by the city, town, or village within the last twenty-
four months. Notwithstanding the provisions of this
section, the governing body of any city, town or village in
any county of the third classification which borders a
county of the fourth classification, a county of the second
classification and the Mississippi River may annex areas
along a road or highway up to two miles from existing
boundaries of the city, town or village or the governing
body in any city, town or village in any county of the third
classification without a township form of government with a
population of at least twenty-four thousand inhabitants but
not more than thirty thousand inhabitants and such county

SB 1342 3
contains a state correctional center may voluntarily annex
such correctional center pursuant to the provisions of this
section if the correctional center is along a road or
highway within two miles from the existing boundaries of the
city, town or village.
2. (1) When a notarized petition, requesting
annexation and signed by the owners of all fee interests of
record in all tracts of real property located within the
area proposed to be annexed, or a request for annexation
signed under the authority of the governing body of any
common interest community and approved by a majority vote of
unit owners located within the area proposed to be annexed
is presented to the governing body of the city, town or
village, the governing body shall hold a public hearing
concerning the matter not less than fourteen nor more than
sixty days after the petition is received, and the hearing
shall be held not less than seven days after notice of the
hearing is published in a newspaper of general circulation
qualified to publish legal matters and located within the
boundary of the petitioned city, town or village. If no
such newspaper exists within the boundary of such city, town
or village, then the notice shall be published in the
qualified newspaper nearest the petitioned city, town or
village. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term
"common-interest community" shall mean a condominium as said
term is used in chapter 448, or a common-interest community,
a cooperative, or a planned community.
(a) A "common-interest community" shall be defined as
real property with respect to which a person, by virtue of
such person's ownership of a unit, is obliged to pay for
real property taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance or
improvement of other real property described in a

SB 1342 4
declaration. "Ownership of a unit" does not include a
leasehold interest of less than twenty years in a unit,
including renewal options;
(b) A "cooperative" shall be defined as a common-
interest community in which the real property is owned by an
association, each of whose members is entitled by virtue of
such member's ownership interest in the association to
exclusive possession of a unit;
(c) A "planned community" shall be defined as a common-
interest community that is not a condominium or a
cooperative. A condominium or cooperative may be part of a
planned community.
(2) At the public hearing any interested person,
corporation or political subdivision may present evidence
regarding the proposed annexation. If, after holding the
hearing, the governing body of the city, town or village
determines that the annexation is reasonable and necessary
to the proper development of the city, town or village, and
100 the city, town or village has the ability to furnish normal
101 municipal services to the area to be annexed within a
102 reasonable time, it may, subject to the provisions of
103 subdivision (3) of this subsection, annex the territory by
104 ordinance without further action.
105 (3) If a written objection to the proposed annexation
106 is filed with the governing body of the city, town or
107 village not later than fourteen days after the public
108 hearing by at least five percent of the qualified voters of
109 the city, town or village, or two qualified voters of the
110 area sought to be annexed if the same contains two qualified
111 voters, the provisions of sections 71.015 and 71.860 to
112 71.920, shall be followed.

SB 1342 5
113 3. If no objection is filed, the city, town or village
114 shall extend its limits by ordinance to include such
115 territory, specifying with accuracy the new boundary lines
116 to which the city's, town's or village's limits are
117 extended. Upon duly enacting such annexation ordinance, the
118 city, town or village shall cause three certified copies of
119 the same to be filed with the county assessor and the clerk
120 of the county wherein the city, town or village is located,
121 and one certified copy to be filed with the election
122 authority, if different from the clerk of the county which
123 has jurisdiction over the area being annexed, whereupon the
124 annexation shall be complete and final and thereafter all
125 courts of this state shall take judicial notice of the
126 limits of that city, town or village as so extended.
127 4. That a petition requesting annexation is not or was
128 not verified or notarized shall not affect the validity of
129 an annexation heretofore or hereafter undertaken in
130 accordance with this section.
131 5. Any action of any kind seeking to deannex from any
132 city, town, or village any area annexed under this section,
133 or seeking in any way to reverse, invalidate, set aside, or
134 otherwise challenge such annexation or oust such city, town,
135 or village from jurisdiction over such annexed area shall be
136 brought within five years of the date of adoption of the
137 annexation ordinance.
138 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
139 contrary, any city, town, or village which annexes an
140 unincorporated area pursuant to this section shall provide
141 all municipal services to the annexed area.
71.015. 1. Should any city, town, or village, not
located in any county of the first classification which has
adopted a constitutional charter for its own local

SB 1342 6
government, seek to annex an area to which objection is
made, the following shall be satisfied:
(1) Before the governing body of any city, town, or
village has adopted a resolution to annex any unincorporated
area of land, such city, town, or village shall first as a
condition precedent determine that:
(a) The land to be annexed is contiguous to the
existing city, town, or village limits and that the length
of the contiguous boundary common to the existing city,
town, or village limit and the proposed area to be annexed
is at least fifteen percent of the length of the perimeter
of the area proposed for annexation; or
(b) The land to be annexed would be contiguous and
compact to the existing city, town, or village limits but
for an intervening state highway or interstate highway as
defined in section 304.001, or railroad right-of-way, and
the shared border of the land to be annexed and existing
city, town, or village composes at least fifteen percent of
the total perimeter of the land to be annexed. For purposes
of calculating the length of such border under this
paragraph, the border between the land to be annexed and the
existing city, town, or village shall be deemed to be:
a. If an intervening state highway or interstate
highway, the centerline; or
b. If a railroad right-of-way, the midpoint between
the outermost rails if there are rails or the best estimate
of the middle of the right-of-way if there are no rails;
(2) The governing body of any city, town, or village
shall propose an ordinance setting forth the following:
(a) The area to be annexed and affirmatively stating
that the boundaries comply with the condition precedent
referred to in subdivision (1) above;

SB 1342 7
(b) That such annexation is reasonable and necessary
to the proper development of the city, town, or village;
(c) That the city has developed a plan of intent to
provide services to the area proposed for annexation;
(d) That a public hearing shall be held prior to the
adoption of the ordinance;
(e) When the annexation is proposed to be effective,
the effective date being up to thirty-six months from the
date of any election held in conjunction thereto;
(3) The city, town, or village shall fix a date for a
public hearing on the ordinance and make a good faith effort
to notify all fee owners of record within the area proposed
to be annexed by certified mail, not less than thirty nor
more than sixty days before the hearing, and notify all
residents of the area by publication of notice in a
newspaper of general circulation qualified to publish legal
matters in the county or counties where the proposed area is
located, at least once a week for three consecutive weeks
prior to the hearing, with at least one such notice being
not more than twenty days and not less than ten days before
the hearing;
(4) At the hearing referred to in subdivision (3) of
this subsection, the city, town, or village shall present
the plan of intent and evidence in support thereof to
include:
(a) A list of major services presently provided by the
city, town, or village including, but not limited to, police
and fire protection, water and sewer systems, street
maintenance, parks and recreation, and refuse collection;
(b) A proposed time schedule whereby the city, town,
or village plans to provide such services to the residents

SB 1342 8
of the proposed area to be annexed within three years from
the date the annexation is to become effective;
(c) The level at which the city, town, or village
assesses property and the rate at which it taxes that
property;
(d) How the city, town, or village proposes to zone
the area to be annexed;
(e) When the proposed annexation shall become
effective;
(5) Following the hearing, and either before or after
the election held in subdivision (6) of this subsection,
should the governing body of the city, town, or village vote
favorably by ordinance to annex the area, the governing body
of the city, town or village shall file an action in the
circuit court of the county in which such unincorporated
area is situated, under the provisions of chapter 527,
praying for a declaratory judgment authorizing such
annexation. The petition in such action shall state facts
showing:
(a) The area to be annexed and its conformity with the
condition precedent referred to in subdivision (1) of this
subsection;
(b) That such annexation is reasonable and necessary
to the proper development of the city, town, or village; and
(c) The ability of the city, town, or village to
furnish normal municipal services of the city, town, or
village to the unincorporated area within a reasonable time
not to exceed three years after the annexation is to become
effective. Such action shall be a class action against the
inhabitants of such unincorporated area under the provisions
of section 507.070;

SB 1342 9
(6) Except as provided in subsection 3 of this
section, if the court authorizes the city, town, or village
100 to make an annexation, the legislative body of such city,
101 town, or village shall not have the power to extend the
102 limits of the city, town, or village by such annexation
103 until an election is held at which the proposition for
104 annexation is approved by a majority of the total votes cast
105 in the city, town, or village and by a separate majority of
106 the total votes cast in the unincorporated territory sought
107 to be annexed. However, should less than a majority of the
108 total votes cast in the area proposed to be annexed vote in
109 favor of the proposal, but at least a majority of the total
110 votes cast in the city, town, or village vote in favor of
111 the proposal, then the proposal shall again be voted upon in
112 not more than one hundred twenty days by both the registered
113 voters of the city, town, or village and the registered
114 voters of the area proposed to be annexed. If at least two-
115 thirds of the qualified electors voting thereon are in favor
116 of the annexation, then the city, town, or village may
117 proceed to annex the territory. If the proposal fails to
118 receive the necessary majority, no part of the area sought
119 to be annexed may be the subject of another proposal to
120 annex for a period of two years from the date of the
121 election, except that, during the two-year period, the
122 owners of all fee interests of record in the area or any
123 portion of the area may petition the city, town, or village
124 for the annexation of the land owned by them pursuant to the
125 procedures in section 71.012. The elections shall if
126 authorized be held, except as herein otherwise provided, in
127 accordance with the general state law governing special
128 elections, and the entire cost of the election or elections

SB 1342 10
129 shall be paid by the city, town, or village proposing to
130 annex the territory;
131 (7) Failure to comply in providing services to the
132 said area or to zone in compliance with the plan of intent
133 within three years after the effective date of the
134 annexation, unless compliance is made unreasonable by an act
135 of God, shall give rise to a cause of action for
136 deannexation which may be filed in the circuit court by any
137 resident of the area who was residing in the area at the
138 time the annexation became effective;
139 (8) No city, town, or village which has filed an
140 action under this section as this section read prior to May
141 13, 1980, which action is part of an annexation proceeding
142 pending on May 13, 1980, shall be required to comply with
143 subdivision (5) of this subsection in regard to such
144 annexation proceeding;
145 (9) If the area proposed for annexation includes a
146 public road or highway but does not include all of the land
147 adjoining such road or highway, then such fee owners of
148 record, of the lands adjoining said highway shall be
149 permitted to intervene in the declaratory judgment action
150 described in subdivision (5) of this subsection.
151 2. Notwithstanding any provision of subsection 1 of
152 this section, for any annexation by any city with a
153 population of three hundred fifty thousand or more
154 inhabitants which is located in more than one county that
155 becomes effective after August 28, 1994, if such city has
156 not provided water and sewer service to such annexed area
157 within three years of the effective date of the annexation,
158 a cause of action shall lie for deannexation, unless the
159 failure to provide such water and sewer service to the
160 annexed area is made unreasonable by an act of God. The

SB 1342 11
161 cause of action for deannexation may be filed in the circuit
162 court by any resident of the annexed area who is presently
163 residing in the area at the time of the filing of the suit
164 and was a resident of the annexed area at the time the
165 annexation became effective. If the suit for deannexation
166 is successful, the city shall be liable for all court costs
167 and attorney fees.
168 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (6)
169 of subsection 1 of this section, all cities, towns, and
170 villages located in any county of the first classification
171 with a charter form of government with a population of more
172 than two hundred thousand [or more inhabitants] but fewer
173 than two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants which adjoins a
174 county with a population of nine hundred thousand or more
175 inhabitants shall comply with the provisions of this
176 subsection. If the court authorizes any city, town, or
177 village subject to this subsection to make an annexation,
178 the legislative body of such city, town or village shall not
179 have the power to extend the limits of such city, town, or
180 village by such annexation until an election is held at
181 which the proposition for annexation is approved by a
182 majority of the total votes cast in such city, town, or
183 village and by a separate majority of the total votes cast
184 in the unincorporated territory sought to be annexed; except
185 that:
186 (1) In the case of a proposed annexation in any area
187 which is contiguous to the existing city, town or village
188 and which is within an area designated as flood plain by the
189 Federal Emergency Management Agency and which is inhabited
190 by no more than thirty registered voters and for which a
191 final declaratory judgment has been granted prior to January
192 1, 1993, approving such annexation and where notarized

SB 1342 12
193 affidavits expressing approval of the proposed annexation
194 are obtained from a majority of the registered voters
195 residing in the area to be annexed, the area may be annexed
196 by an ordinance duly enacted by the governing body and no
197 elections shall be required; and
198 (2) In the case of a proposed annexation of
199 unincorporated territory in which no qualified electors
200 reside, if at least a majority of the qualified electors
201 voting on the proposition are in favor of the annexation,
202 the city, town or village may proceed to annex the territory
203 and no subsequent election shall be required.
204 If the proposal fails to receive the necessary separate
205 majorities, no part of the area sought to be annexed may be
206 the subject of any other proposal to annex for a period of
207 two years from the date of such election, except that,
208 during the two-year period, the owners of all fee interests
209 of record in the area or any portion of the area may
210 petition the city, town, or village for the annexation of
211 the land owned by them pursuant to the procedures in section
212 71.012 or 71.014. The election shall, if authorized, be
213 held, except as otherwise provided in this section, in
214 accordance with the general state laws governing special
215 elections, and the entire cost of the election or elections
216 shall be paid by the city, town, or village proposing to
217 annex the territory. Failure of the city, town or village
218 to comply in providing services to the area or to zone in
219 compliance with the plan of intent within three years after
220 the effective date of the annexation, unless compliance is
221 made unreasonable by an act of God, shall give rise to a
222 cause of action for deannexation which may be filed in the
223 circuit court not later than four years after the effective

SB 1342 13
224 date of the annexation by any resident of the area who was
225 residing in such area at the time the annexation became
226 effective or by any nonresident owner of real property in
227 such area.
228 4. Except for a cause of action for deannexation under
229 subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of this section, any action
230 of any kind seeking to deannex from any city, town, or
231 village any area annexed under this section, or seeking in
232 any way to reverse, invalidate, set aside, or otherwise
233 challenge such annexation or oust such city, town, or
234 village from jurisdiction over such annexed area shall be
235 brought within five years of the date of the adoption of the
236 annexation ordinance.
✓